Utah statutes.
58-17b-616.   Drug stock sales -- Labeling.
(1)  A manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor of prescription drugs may not
sell or give any prescription drug to any person, unless the prescription drug
stock container bears a label containing information as defined by rule, the
name and place of business of the manufacturer of the finished dosage form of
the drug, and if different from the manufacturer, the name and place of
business of the packer or distributor.
(2)  Each tablet or capsule shall be marked with an identification code or
monogram, unless waived by the division.
(3)  Each stock package shall bear an expiration date and lot number.
